North Carolina statutes. Chapter 66. Commerce and Business.
Article 15. Person Trading as “Company” or “Agent”.

§ 66-72.
Person trading as “company” or “agent” to disclose real parties.

If any person shall transact business as trader or merchant, with the addition of the words “factor,” “agent,” “& Company” or “& Co.,” or shall conduct such business under any name or style other than his own, except in case of a corporation, and fail to disclose the name of his principal or partner by a sign placed conspicuously at the place wherein such business is conducted, then all the property, stock of goods and merchandise, and choses in action purchased, used and contracted in the course of such business shall, as to creditors, be liable for the debts contracted in the course of such business by the person in charge of same. Provided, this section shall not apply to any person transacting business under license as an auctioneer, broker, or commission merchant; in all actions under this section it is incumbent on such trader or merchant to prove compliance with the same.

History.

1905, c. 443; Rev., s. 2118; C.S., s. 3292; 1951, c. 381, s. 8.

Cross References.

As to running of statute of limitations against undisclosed partner, see

G.S. 1-28

.

Legal Periodicals.

For note on consignments and the consignor’s duty to satisfy public notice requirements, see 13 Wake Forest L. Rev. 507 (1977).